Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1794.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 11-483, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-483. Records maintained by county recorder; confidentiality; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, in any county an eligible person may request that the general public be prohibited from accessing the unique identifier and the recording date contained in indexes of recorded instruments maintained by the county recorder and may request the county recorder to prohibit access to that person's identifying information, including any of the following: 1. That person's documents, instruments or writings recorded by the county recorder. 2. If the person is a public official, the address of a property held in trust by the public official. B. An eligible person may request this action by filing an affidavit that states all of the following on an application form developed by the administrative office of the courts in agreement with an association of counties, an organization of peace officers and the motor vehicle division of the department of transportation: 1. The person's full legal name and residential address. 2. The full legal description and parcel number of the person's property. 3. Unless the person is the spouse of a peace officer or the spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer or the person is a former public official or former judge, the position the person currently holds and a description of the person's duties, except that an eligible person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment shall instead attach a copy of the order of protection or injunction against harassment or an eligible person who is a participant in the address confidentiality program shall instead attach a copy of the participant's current and valid address confidentiality program authorization card issued pursuant to section 41-163 and a statement of certification provided by the secretary of state's office. 4. The reasons the person reasonably believes that the person's life or safety or that of another person is in danger and that restricting access pursuant to this section will serve to reduce the danger. 5. The document locator number and recording date of each instrument for which the person requests access restriction pursuant to this section. 6. A copy of pages from each instrument that includes the document locator number and the person's identifying information, including the person's full legal name and residential address or full legal name and telephone number. C. If an eligible person is also requesting pursuant to section 11-484 that the general public be prohibited from accessing records maintained by the county assessor and county treasurer, the eligible person may combine the request pursuant to subsection B of this section with the request pursuant to section 11-484 by filing one affidavit. The affidavit and subsequent action by the appropriate authorities shall meet all of the requirements of this section and section 11-484. D. The affidavit shall be filed with the presiding judge of the superior court in the county in which the affiant resides. To prevent multiple filings, an eligible person who is a peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member or law enforcement support staff member shall deliver the affidavit to the peace officer's commanding officer, or to the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, who shall file the affidavits at one time.  In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier presentation, the commanding officer, or the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, shall not file affidavits more often than quarterly. E. On receipt of an affidavit or affidavits, the presiding judge of the superior court shall file with the clerk of the superior court a petition on behalf of all requesting affiants. Each affidavit presented shall be attached to the petition. In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier consideration, the presiding judge may accumulate affidavits and file a petition at the end of each quarter. F. The presiding judge of the superior court shall review the petition and each attached affidavit to determine whether the action requested by each affiant should be granted. If the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that the action requested by the affiant will reduce a danger to the life or safety of the affiant or another person, the presiding judge of the superior court shall order that the county recorder prohibit access for five years to the affiant's identifying information, including any of that person's documents, instruments or writings recorded by the county recorder and made available on the internet.  If the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that the affiant or another person is in actual danger of physical harm from a person or persons with whom the affiant has had official dealings and that action pursuant to this section will reduce a danger to the life or safety of the affiant or another person, the presiding judge of the superior court shall order that the general public be prohibited for five years from accessing the unique identifier and the recording date contained in indexes of recorded instruments maintained by the county recorder and identified pursuant to subsection B of this section. G. On motion to the court, if the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that an instrument or writing recorded by the county recorder has been redacted or sealed in error, that the original affiant no longer lives at the address listed in the original affidavit, that the cause for the original affidavit no longer exists or that temporary access to the instrument or writing is needed, the presiding judge may temporarily stay or permanently vacate all or part of the court order prohibiting public access to the recorded instrument or writing. H. On entry of the court order, the clerk of the superior court shall file the court order and a copy of the affidavit required by subsection B of this section with the county recorder.  Not more than ten days after the date on which the county recorder receives the court order, the county recorder shall restrict access to the information as required by subsection F of this section. I. If the court denies an affiant's request pursuant to this section, the affiant may request a court hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by the court in the county where the petition was filed. J. The county recorder shall remove the restrictions on all records restricted pursuant to this section by January 5 in the year after the court order expires.  The county recorder shall send by mail one notice to either the health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment or the employing agency of the peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member, law enforcement support staff member or employee of adult protective services who was granted an order pursuant to this section of the order's expiration date at least six months before the expiration date.  If the notice is sent to the employing agency, the employing agency shall immediately notify the person who was granted the order of the upcoming expiration date.  The county recorder may coordinate with the county assessor and county treasurer to prevent multiple notices from being sent to the same person. K. To include subsequent recordings in the court order, the eligible person shall present to the county recorder at the time of recordation a certified copy of the court order or shall provide to the county recorder the recording number of the court order. The county recorder shall ensure that public access is restricted pursuant to subsection A of this section. L. This section does not restrict access to public records for the purposes of perfecting a lien pursuant to title 12, chapter 9, article 2. M. This section does not prohibit access to the records of the county recorder by parties to the instrument, a law enforcement officer performing the officer's official duties pursuant to subsection N of this section, a title insurer, a title insurance agent or an escrow agent licensed by the department of insurance and financial institutions. N. A law enforcement officer is deemed to be performing the officer's official duties if the officer provides a subpoena, court order or search warrant for the records. O. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Code enforcement officer" means a person who is employed by a state or local government and whose duties include performing field inspections of buildings, structures or property to ensure compliance with and enforce national, state and local laws, ordinances and codes. 2. "Commissioner" means a commissioner of the superior court or municipal court. 3. "Corrections support staff member" means an adult or juvenile corrections employee who has direct contact with inmates. 4. "Election officer" means a state, county or municipal employee who holds an election officer's certificate issued pursuant to section 16-407 an individual, including an election board member, who is assigned by this state or a political subdivision of this state to perform official duties related to elections. 5. "Eligible person" means a health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, justice, judge, commissioner, hearing officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, adult or juvenile corrections officer, corrections support staff member, probation officer, member of the commission on appellate court appointments, member of the board of executive clemency, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment, national guard member who is acting in support of a law enforcement agency, person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment, person who is a participant in the address confidentiality program pursuant to title 41, chapter 1, article 3 or firefighter who is assigned to the Arizona counter terrorism information center in the department of public safety. 6. "Former public official" means a person who was duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature or a statewide office, who ceased serving in that capacity and who was the victim of a dangerous offense as defined in section 13-105 while in office. 7. "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17, 19.1, 25 or 33. 8. "Hearing officer" means a hearing officer who is appointed pursuant to section 28-1553. 9. "Indexes" means only those indexes that are maintained by and located in the office of the county recorder, that are accessed electronically and that contain information beginning from and after January 1, 1987. 10. "Judge" means a judge or former judge of the United States district court, the United States court of appeals, the United States magistrate court, the United States bankruptcy court, the United States immigration court, the Arizona court of appeals, the superior court or a municipal court. 11. "Justice" means a justice of the United States or Arizona supreme court or a justice of the peace. 12. "Law enforcement support staff member" means a person who serves in the role of an investigator or prosecutorial assistant in an agency that investigates or prosecutes crimes, who is integral to the investigation or prosecution of crimes and whose name or identity will be revealed in the course of public proceedings. 13. "Peace officer": (a) Means any person vested by law, or formerly vested by law, with a duty to maintain public order and make arrests. (b) Includes a federal law enforcement officer or agent who resides in this state and who has the power to make arrests pursuant to federal law. 14. "Prosecutor" means a current or former county attorney, municipal prosecutor, attorney general or United States attorney and includes a current or former assistant or deputy United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general. 15. "Public defender" means a federal public defender, county public defender, county legal defender or county contract indigent defense counsel and includes an assistant or deputy federal public defender, county public defender or county legal defender. 16. "Public official" means a person who is duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature, a statewide office or a county, city or town office. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 11-484, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-484. Records maintained by county assessor and county treasurer; redaction; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, in any county an eligible person may request that the general public be prohibited from accessing that person's identifying information, including any of the following: 1. That person's documents, instruments, writings and information maintained by the county assessor and the county treasurer. 2. If the person is a public official, the address of a property held in trust by the public official. B. An eligible person may request this action by filing an affidavit that states all of the following on an application form developed by the administrative office of the courts in agreement with an association of counties, an organization of peace officers and the motor vehicle division of the department of transportation: 1. The person's full legal name and residential address. 2. The full legal description and parcel number of the person's property. 3. Unless the person is the spouse of a peace officer or the spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer or the person is a former public official or former judge, the position the person currently holds and a description of the person's duties, except that an eligible person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment shall attach a copy of the order of protection or injunction against harassment or an eligible person who is a participant in the address confidentiality program shall instead attach a copy of the participant's current and valid address confidentiality program authorization card issued pursuant to section 41-163 and a statement of certification provided by the secretary of state's office. 4. The reasons the person reasonably believes that the person's life or safety or that of another person is in danger and that redacting the person's identifying information, including the residential address and telephone number, will serve to reduce the danger. C. If an eligible person is also requesting pursuant to section 11-483 that the general public be prohibited from accessing records maintained by the county recorder, the eligible person may combine the request pursuant to subsection B of this section with the request pursuant to section 11-483 by filing one affidavit.  The affidavit and subsequent action by the appropriate authorities shall meet all of the requirements of this section and section 11-483. D. The affidavit shall be filed with the presiding judge of the superior court in the county in which the affiant resides. To prevent multiple filings, an eligible person who is a peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member or law enforcement support staff member shall deliver the affidavit to the peace officer's commanding officer, or to the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, who shall file the affidavits at one time.  In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier presentation, the commanding officer, or the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, shall not file affidavits more often than quarterly. E. On receipt of an affidavit or affidavits, the presiding judge of the superior court shall file with the clerk of the superior court a petition on behalf of all requesting affiants. Each affidavit presented shall be attached to the petition. In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier consideration, the presiding judge may accumulate affidavits and file a petition at the end of each quarter. F. The presiding judge of the superior court shall review the petition and each attached affidavit to determine whether the action requested by each affiant should be granted. If the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that the action requested by the affiant will reduce a danger to the life or safety of the affiant or another person, the presiding judge of the superior court shall order the redaction of the affiant's identifying information, including any of that person's documents, instruments, writings and information maintained by the county assessor and the county treasurer. The redaction shall be in effect for five years. G. On motion to the court, if the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that an instrument or writing maintained by the county assessor or the county treasurer has been redacted or sealed in error, that the original affiant no longer lives at the address listed in the original affidavit, that the cause for the original affidavit no longer exists or that temporary access to the instrument or writing is needed, the presiding judge may temporarily stay or permanently vacate all or part of the court order prohibiting public access to the instrument or writing. H. On entry of the court order, the clerk of the superior court shall file the court order and a copy of the affidavit required by subsection B of this section with the county assessor and the county treasurer.  Not more than ten days after the date on which the county assessor and the county treasurer receive the court order, the county assessor and the county treasurer shall restrict access to the information as required by subsection F of this section. I. If the court denies an affiant's request pursuant to this section, the affiant may request a court hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by the court in the county where the petition was filed. J. The county assessor and the county treasurer shall remove the restrictions on all records that are redacted pursuant to this section by January 5 in the year after the court order expires.  The county assessor or the county treasurer shall send by mail one notice to either the health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment or the employing agency of the peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member, law enforcement support staff member or employee of adult protective services who was granted an order pursuant to this section of the order's expiration date at least six months before the expiration date.  If the notice is sent to the employing agency, the employing agency shall immediately notify the person who was granted the order of the upcoming expiration date. The county assessor or county treasurer may coordinate with the county recorder to prevent multiple notices from being sent to the same person. K. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Code enforcement officer" means a person who is employed by a state or local government and whose duties include performing field inspections of buildings, structures or property to ensure compliance with and enforce national, state and local laws, ordinances and codes. 2. "Commissioner" means a commissioner of the superior court or municipal court. 3. "Corrections support staff member" means an adult or juvenile corrections employee who has direct contact with inmates. 4. "Election officer" means a state, county or municipal employee who holds an election officer's certificate issued pursuant to section 16-407 an individual, including an election board member, who is assigned by this state or a political subdivision of this state to perform official duties related to elections. 5. "Eligible person" means a health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, justice, judge, commissioner, hearing officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, adult or juvenile corrections officer, corrections support staff member, probation officer, member of the commission on appellate court appointments, member of the board of executive clemency, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment, national guard member who is acting in support of a law enforcement agency, person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment, person who is a participant in the address confidentiality program pursuant to title 41, chapter 1, article 3, or firefighter who is assigned to the Arizona counter terrorism information center in the department of public safety. 6. "Former public official" means a person who was duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature or a statewide office, who ceased serving in that capacity and who was the victim of a dangerous offense as defined in section 13-105 while in office. 7. "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17, 19.1, 25 or 33. 8. "Hearing officer" means a hearing officer who is appointed pursuant to section 28-1553. 9. "Judge" means a judge or former judge of the United States district court, the United States court of appeals, the United States magistrate court, the United States bankruptcy court, the United States immigration court, the Arizona court of appeals, the superior court or a municipal court. 10. "Justice" means a justice of the United States or Arizona supreme court or a justice of the peace. 11. "Law enforcement support staff member" means a person who serves in the role of an investigator or prosecutorial assistant in an agency that investigates or prosecutes crimes, who is integral to the investigation or prosecution of crimes and whose name or identity will be revealed in the course of public proceedings. 12. "Peace officer": (a) Means any person vested by law, or formerly vested by law, with a duty to maintain public order and make arrests. (b) Includes a federal law enforcement officer or agent who resides in this state and who has the power to make arrests pursuant to federal law. 13. "Prosecutor" means a current or former county attorney, municipal prosecutor, attorney general or United States attorney and includes a current or former assistant or deputy United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general. 14. "Public defender" means a federal public defender, county public defender, county legal defender or county contract indigent defense counsel and includes an assistant or deputy federal public defender, county public defender or county legal defender. 15. "Public official" means a person who is duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature, a statewide office or a county, city or town office. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 13-2401, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-2401. Personal information on the internet; exception; classification; definitions A. It is unlawful for a person to knowingly make available on the internet the personal information of a health professional, election officer, public official, peace officer, justice, judge, commissioner, hearing officer, public defender, member of the commission on appellate court appointments, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment or prosecutor if the dissemination of the personal  information poses an imminent and serious threat to the health professional's, election officer's, public official's, peace officer's, justice's, judge's, commissioner's, hearing officer's, public defender's, member's, department of child safety employee's, adult protective services employee's or prosecutor's safety or the safety of that person's immediate family and the threat is reasonably apparent to the person making the information available on the internet to be serious and imminent.  For the purposes of this subsection, "personal information" includes the address of a property held in trust by a public official. B. It is not a violation of this section if an employee of a county recorder, county treasurer or county assessor publishes personal information, in good faith, on the website of the county recorder, county treasurer or county assessor in the ordinary course of carrying out public functions. C. A violation of subsection A of this section is a class 5 felony. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Commissioner" means a commissioner of the superior court or municipal court. 2. "Election officer" means a state, county or municipal employee who holds an election officer's certificate issued pursuant to section 16-407 an individual, including an election board member, who is assigned by this state or a political subdivision of this state to perform official duties related to elections. 3. "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17, 19.1, 25 or 33. 4. "Hearing officer" means a hearing officer who is appointed pursuant to section 28-1553. 5. "Immediate family" means a health professional's, peace officer's, justice's, judge's, commissioner's, public defender's or prosecutor's spouse, child or parent and any other adult who lives in the same residence as the person. 6. "Judge" means a judge of the United States district court, the United States court of appeals, the United States magistrate court, the United States bankruptcy court, the Arizona court of appeals, the superior court or a municipal court. 7. "Justice" means a justice of the United States or Arizona supreme court or a justice of the peace. 8. "Personal information" means a health professional's, election officer's, public official's, peace officer's, justice's, judge's, commissioner's, hearing officer's, public defender's, commission on appellate court appointments member's or prosecutor's home address, home telephone number, pager number or personal photograph, directions to the person's home or photographs of the person's home or vehicle. 9. "Prosecutor" means a current or former county attorney, municipal prosecutor, attorney general or United States attorney and includes a current or former assistant or deputy United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general. 10. "Public defender" means a federal public defender, county public defender, county legal defender or county contract indigent defense counsel and includes an assistant or deputy federal public defender, county public defender or county legal defender. 11. "Public official" means a person who is duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature, a statewide office or a county, city or town office. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 16-153, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-153. Voter registration; confidentiality; definitions A. Eligible persons, and any other registered voter who resides at the same residence address as the eligible person, may request that the general public be prohibited from accessing the eligible person's identifying information, including any of the following: 1. That person's documents and voting precinct number contained in that person's voter registration record. 2. If the person is a public official, the address of a property held in trust by the public official. B. Eligible persons may request this action by filing an affidavit that states all of the following on an application form developed by the administrative office of the courts in agreement with an association of counties and an organization of peace officers: 1. The person's full legal name, residential address and date of birth. 2. Unless the person is the spouse of a peace officer or the spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer or the person is a former public official or former judge, the position the person currently holds and a description of the person's duties, except that an eligible person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment shall instead attach a copy of the order of protection or injunction against harassment. 3. The reasons for reasonably believing that the person's life or safety or that of another person is in danger and that sealing the identifying information and voting precinct number of the person's voting record will serve to reduce the danger. C. The affidavit shall be filed with the presiding judge of the superior court in the county in which the affiant resides. To prevent multiple filings, an eligible person who is a peace officer, prosecutor, public defender, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member or law enforcement support staff member shall deliver the affidavit to the peace officer's commanding officer, or to the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, who shall file the affidavits at one time. In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and is supported by facts justifying an earlier presentation, the commanding officer, or the head of the prosecuting, public defender, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, shall not file affidavits more often than quarterly. D. On receipt of an affidavit or affidavits, the presiding judge of the superior court shall file with the clerk of the superior court a petition on behalf of all requesting affiants.  The petition shall have attached each affidavit presented.  In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier consideration, the presiding judge may accumulate affidavits and file a petition at the end of each quarter. E. The presiding judge of the superior court shall review the petition and each attached affidavit to determine whether the action requested by each affiant should be granted.  The presiding judge of the superior court shall order the sealing for five years of the information contained in the voter record of the affiant and, on request, any other registered voter who resides at the same residence address if the presiding judge concludes that this action will reduce a danger to the life or safety of the affiant. F. The recorder shall remove the restrictions on all voter records submitted pursuant to subsection E of this section by January 5 in the year after the court order expires. The county recorder shall send by mail one notice to either the health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment or the employing agency of the peace officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member or law enforcement support staff member who was granted an order pursuant to this section of the order's expiration date at least six months before the January 5 removal date. If the notice is sent to the employing agency, the employing agency shall immediately notify the person who was granted the order of the upcoming expiration date. The county recorder may coordinate with the county assessor and county treasurer to prevent multiple notices from being sent to the same person. G. On entry of the court order, the clerk of the superior court shall file the court order with the county recorder. On receipt of the court order the county recorder shall seal the voter registration of the persons listed in the court order not later than one hundred twenty days from the date of receipt of the court order. To include a subsequent voter registration in the court order, a person listed in the court order shall present to the county recorder at the time of registration a certified copy of the court order or shall provide the county recorder the recording number of the court order. The information in the registration shall not be disclosed and is not a public record. H. If the court denies an affiant's requested sealing of the voter registration record, the affiant may request a court hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by the court where the petition was filed. I. On motion to the court, if the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that a voter registration record has been sealed in error or that the cause for the original affidavit no longer exists, the presiding judge may vacate the court order prohibiting public access to the voter registration record. J. On request by a person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment and presentation of an order of protection issued pursuant to section 13-3602, an injunction against harassment issued pursuant to section 12-1809 or an order of protection or injunction against harassment issued by a court in another state or a program participant in the address confidentiality program pursuant to title 41, chapter 1, article 3, the county recorder shall seal the voter registration record of the person who is protected and, on request, any other registered voter who resides at the residence address of the protected person. The record shall be sealed not later than one hundred twenty days from the date of receipt of the court order.  The information in the registration shall not be disclosed and is not a public record. K. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Code enforcement officer" means a person who is employed by a state or local government and whose duties include performing field inspections of buildings, structures or property to ensure compliance with and enforce national, state and local laws, ordinances and codes. 2. "Commissioner" means a commissioner of the superior court or municipal court. 3. "Corrections support staff member" means an adult or juvenile corrections employee who has direct contact with inmates. 4. "Election officer" means a state, county or municipal employee who holds an election officer's certificate issued pursuant to section 16-407 an individual, including an election board member, who is assigned by this state or a political subdivision of this state to perform official duties related to elections. 5. "Eligible person" means a health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, justice, judge, commissioner, hearing officer, public defender, prosecutor, member of the commission on appellate court appointments, code enforcement officer, adult or juvenile corrections officer, corrections support staff member, probation officer, member of the board of executive clemency, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment, national guard member who is acting in support of a law enforcement agency, person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment or firefighter who is assigned to the Arizona counter terrorism information center in the department of public safety. 6. "Former public official" means a person who was duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature or a statewide office, who ceased serving in that capacity and who was the victim of a dangerous offense as defined in section 13-105 while in office. 7. "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17, 19.1, 25 or 33. 8. "Hearing officer" means a hearing officer who is appointed pursuant to section 28-1553. 9. "Judge" means a judge or former judge of the United States district court, the United States court of appeals, the United States magistrate court, the United States bankruptcy court, the United States immigration court, the Arizona court of appeals, the superior court or a municipal court. 10. "Justice" means a justice of the United States or Arizona supreme court or a justice of the peace. 11. "Law enforcement support staff member" means a person who serves in the role of an investigator or prosecutorial assistant in an agency that investigates or prosecutes crimes, who is integral to the investigation or prosecution of crimes and whose name or identity will be revealed in the course of public proceedings. 12. "Peace officer": (a) Has the same meaning prescribed in section 1-215. (b) Includes a federal law enforcement officer or agent who resides in this state and who has the power to make arrests pursuant to federal law. 13. "Prosecutor" means a current or former United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general and includes a current or former assistant or deputy United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general. 14. "Public defender" means a federal public defender, county public defender, county legal defender or county contract indigent defense counsel and includes an assistant or deputy federal public defender, county public defender or county legal defender. 15. "Public official" means a person who is duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature, a statewide office or a county, city or town office. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Title 16, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-1025, to read: START_STATUTE16-1025. Election officer; release of personal information; violation; classification; definitions A. It is unlawful for a person to knowingly and without the election officer's consent make the personal information of the election officer or the election officer's family or household member publicly available if both: 1. The dissemination poses an imminent and serious threat to the safety of the election officer or an election officer's family or household member. 2. The person making the information publicly available knows or reasonably should know of any imminent and serious threat. B. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Election officer" means an individual, including an election board member, who is assigned by this state or a political subdivision of this state to perform official duties related to elections. 2. "Personal information" means a person's home address, home telephone number, pager number or personal photograph, directions to the person's home or photographs of the person's home or vehicle.END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 28-454, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-454. Records maintained by department of transportation; redaction; definitions A. Notwithstanding sections 28-447 and 28-455, an eligible person may request that persons be prohibited from accessing the eligible person's identifying information, including any of the following: 1. That person's documents, contained in any record maintained by the department. 2. If the person is a public official, the address of a property held in trust by the public official. B. An eligible person may request this action by filing an affidavit that states all of the following on an application form developed by the administrative office of the courts in agreement with an association of counties, an organization of peace officers and the department: 1. The person's full legal name and residential address. 2. Unless the person is the spouse of a peace officer or the spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer or the person is a former public official or former judge, the position the person currently holds and a description of the person's duties, except that an eligible person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment shall attach a copy of the order of protection or injunction against harassment. 3. The reasons the person reasonably believes that the person's life or safety or that of another person is in danger and that redacting the identifying information from the department's public records will serve to reduce the danger. C. The affidavit shall be filed with the presiding judge of the superior court in the county in which the affiant resides. To prevent multiple filings, an eligible person who is a peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, corrections or detention officer, corrections support staff member or law enforcement support staff member shall deliver the affidavit to the peace officer's commanding officer, or to the head of the prosecuting, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, who shall file the affidavits at one time. In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier presentation, the commanding officer, or the head of the prosecuting, code enforcement, law enforcement, corrections or detention agency, as applicable, or that person's designee, shall not file affidavits more often than quarterly. D. On receipt of an affidavit or affidavits, the presiding judge of the superior court shall file with the clerk of the superior court a petition on behalf of all requesting affiants. Each affidavit presented shall be attached to the petition. In the absence of an affidavit that contains a request for immediate action and that is supported by facts justifying an earlier consideration, the presiding judge may accumulate affidavits and file a petition at the end of each quarter. E. The presiding judge of the superior court shall review the petition and each attached affidavit to determine whether the action requested by each affiant should be granted.  The presiding judge of the superior court shall order the redaction of the residence address and telephone number from the public records maintained by the department if the judge concludes that this action will reduce a danger to the life or safety of the affiant or another person. F. On entry of the court order, the clerk of the superior court shall file the court order with the department.  Not more than one hundred fifty days after the date the department receives the court order, the department shall redact the identifying information of the affiants listed in the court order from the public records of the department. The identifying information shall not be disclosed and is not part of a public record. G. If the court denies an affiant's request pursuant to this section, the affiant may request a court hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by the court in the county where the petition was filed. H. On motion to the court, if the presiding judge of the superior court concludes that identifying information has been sealed in error or that the cause for the original affidavit no longer exists, the presiding judge may vacate the court order prohibiting public access to the identifying information. I. Notwithstanding sections 28-447 and 28-455, the department shall not release a photograph of a peace officer if the peace officer has made a request as prescribed in this section that persons be prohibited from accessing the peace officer's identifying information in any record maintained by the department. J. This section does not prohibit the use of a peace officer's photograph that is either: 1. Used by a law enforcement agency to assist a person who has a complaint against an officer to identify the officer. 2. Obtained from a source other than the department. K. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Code enforcement officer" means a person who is employed by a state or local government and whose duties include performing field inspections of buildings, structures or property to ensure compliance with and enforce national, state and local laws, ordinances and codes. 2. "Commissioner" means a commissioner of the superior court or municipal court. 3. "Corrections support staff member" means an adult or juvenile corrections employee who has direct contact with inmates. 4. "Election officer" means a state, county or municipal employee who holds an election officer's certificate issued pursuant to section 16-407 an individual, including an election board member, who is assigned by this state or a political subdivision of this state to perform official duties related to elections. 5. "Eligible person" means a health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased public peace officer, justice, judge or former judge, commissioner, hearing officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, adult or juvenile corrections officer, corrections support staff member, probation officer, member of the commission on appellate court appointments, member of the board of executive clemency, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment, national guard member who is acting in support of a law enforcement agency, person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment or firefighter who is assigned to the Arizona counter terrorism information center in the department of public safety. 6. "Former public official" means a person who was duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature or a statewide office, who ceased serving in that capacity and who was the victim of a dangerous offense as defined in section 13-105 while in office. 7. "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17, 19.1, 25 or 33. 8. "Hearing officer" means a hearing officer who is appointed pursuant to section 28-1553. 9. "Judge" means a judge or former judge of the United States district court, the United States court of appeals, the United States magistrate court, the United States bankruptcy court, the United States immigration court, the Arizona court of appeals, the superior court or a municipal court. 10. "Justice" means a justice of the United States supreme court or the Arizona supreme court or a justice of the peace. 11. "Law enforcement support staff member" means a person who serves in the role of an investigator or prosecutorial assistant in an agency that investigates or prosecutes crimes, who is integral to the investigation or prosecution of crimes and whose name or identity will be revealed in the course of public proceedings. 12. "Peace officer": (a) Has the same meaning prescribed in section 1-215. (b) Includes a federal law enforcement officer or agent who resides in this state and who has the power to make arrests pursuant to federal law. 13. "Prosecutor" means a current or former United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general and includes a current or former assistant or deputy United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general. 14. "Public official" means a person who is duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature, a statewide office or a county, city or town office. END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 39-123, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE39-123. Information identifying eligible persons; confidentiality; definitions A. Nothing in This chapter requires does not require disclosure from a personnel file by a law enforcement agency or employing state or local governmental entity of the home address or home telephone number of eligible persons or the address of a property held in trust by a public official. B. The agency or governmental entity may release the information in subsection A of this section only if either: 1. The person consents in writing to the release. 2. The custodian of records of the agency or governmental entity determines that release of the information does not create a reasonable risk of physical injury to the person or the person's immediate family or damage to the property of the person or the person's immediate family. C. A law enforcement agency may release a photograph of a peace officer if either: 1. The peace officer has been arrested or has been formally charged by complaint, information or indictment for a misdemeanor or a felony offense. 2. The photograph is requested by a representative of a newspaper for a specific newsworthy event unless: (a) The peace officer is serving in an undercover capacity or is scheduled to be serving in an undercover capacity within sixty days. (b) The release of the photograph is not in the best interest of this state after taking into consideration the privacy, confidentiality and safety of the peace officer. (c) An order pursuant to section 28-454 is in effect. D. This section does not prohibit the use of a peace officer's photograph that is either: 1. Used by a law enforcement agency to assist a person who has a complaint against an officer to identify the officer. 2. Obtained from a source other than the law enforcement agency. E. This section does not apply to a certified peace officer or code enforcement officer who is no longer employed as a peace officer or code enforcement officer by a state or local government entity. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Code enforcement officer" means a person who is employed by a state or local government and whose duties include performing field inspections of buildings, structures or property to ensure compliance with and enforce national, state and local laws, ordinances and codes. 2. "Commissioner" means a commissioner of the superior court or municipal court. 3. "Corrections support staff member" means an adult or juvenile corrections employee who has direct contact with inmates. 4. "Election officer" means a state, county or municipal employee who holds an election officer's certificate issued pursuant to section 16-407 an individual, including an election board member, who is assigned by this state or a political subdivision of this state to perform official duties related to elections. 5. "Eligible person" means a health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, border patrol agent, justice, judge, commissioner, hearing officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, adult or juvenile corrections officer, corrections support staff member, probation officer, member of the commission on appellate court appointments, member of the board of executive clemency, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment, national guard member who is acting in support of a law enforcement agency, person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment, firefighter who is assigned to the Arizona counter terrorism information center in the department of public safety or victim of domestic violence or stalking who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment. 6. "Former public official" means a person who was duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature or a statewide office, who ceased serving in that capacity and who was the victim of a dangerous offense as defined in section 13-105 while in office. 7. "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17, 19.1, 25 or 33. 8. "Hearing officer" means a hearing officer who is appointed pursuant to section 28-1553. 9. "Judge" means a judge or former judge of the United States district court, the United States court of appeals, the United States magistrate court, the United States bankruptcy court, the United States immigration court, the Arizona court of appeals, the superior court or a municipal court. 10. "Justice" means a justice of the United States or Arizona supreme court or a justice of the peace. 11. "Law enforcement support staff member" means a person who serves in the role of an investigator or prosecutorial assistant in an agency that investigates or prosecutes crimes, who is integral to the investigation or prosecution of crimes and whose name or identity will be revealed in the course of public proceedings. 12. "Peace officer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-105. 13. "Prosecutor" means a current or former county attorney, municipal prosecutor, attorney general or United States attorney and includes a current or former assistant or deputy United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general. 14. "Public defender" means a federal public defender, county public defender, county legal defender or county contract indigent defense counsel and includes an assistant or deputy federal public defender, county public defender or county legal defender. 15. "Public official" means a person who is duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature, a statewide office or a county, city or town office. END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 39-124, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE39-124. Releasing information identifying an eligible person; violations; classification; definitions A. Any person who is employed by a state or local government entity and who, in violation of section 39-123, knowingly releases the home address or home telephone number of an eligible person or the address of a property held in trust by a public official with the intent to hinder an investigation, cause physical injury to an eligible person or the eligible person's immediate family or cause damage to the property of an eligible person or the eligible person's immediate family is guilty of a class 6 felony. B. Any person who is employed by a state or local government entity and who, in violation of section 39-123, knowingly releases a photograph of a peace officer with the intent to hinder an investigation, cause physical injury to a peace officer or the peace officer's immediate family or cause damage to the property of a peace officer or the peace officer's immediate family is guilty of a class 6 felony. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Code enforcement officer" means a person who is employed by a state or local government and whose duties include performing field inspections of buildings, structures or property to ensure compliance with and enforce national, state and local laws, ordinances and codes. 2. "Commissioner" means a commissioner of the superior court or municipal court. 3. "Corrections support staff member" means an adult or juvenile corrections employee who has direct contact with inmates. 4. "Election officer" means a state, county or municipal employee who holds an election officer's certificate issued pursuant to section 16-407 an individual, including an election board member, who is assigned by this state or a political subdivision of this state to perform official duties related to elections. 5. "Eligible person" means a health professional, election officer, public official, former public official, peace officer, spouse of a peace officer, spouse or minor child of a deceased peace officer, border patrol agent, justice, judge, commissioner, hearing officer, public defender, prosecutor, code enforcement officer, adult or juvenile corrections officer, corrections support staff member, probation officer, member of the board of executive clemency, law enforcement support staff member, employee of the department of child safety or employee of adult protective services who has direct contact with families in the course of employment, national guard member who is acting in support of a law enforcement agency, person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment, firefighter who is assigned to the Arizona counter terrorism information center in the department of public safety or victim of domestic violence or stalking who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment. 6. "Former public official" means a person who was duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature or a statewide office, who ceased serving in that capacity and who was the victim of a dangerous offense as defined in section 13-105 while in office. 7. "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17, 19.1, 25 or 33. 8. "Hearing officer" means a hearing officer who is appointed pursuant to section 28-1553. 9. "Judge" means a judge or former judge of the United States district court, the United States court of appeals, the United States magistrate court, the United States bankruptcy court, the United States immigration court, the Arizona court of appeals, the superior court or a municipal court. 10. "Justice" means a justice of the United States or Arizona supreme court or a justice of the peace. 11. "Law enforcement support staff member" means a person who serves in the role of an investigator or prosecutorial assistant in an agency that investigates or prosecutes crimes, who is integral to the investigation or prosecution of crimes and whose name or identity will be revealed in the course of public proceedings. 12. "Peace officer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-105. 13. "Prosecutor" means a current or former county attorney, municipal prosecutor, attorney general or United States attorney and includes a current or former assistant or deputy United States attorney, county attorney, municipal prosecutor or attorney general. 14. "Public defender" means a federal public defender, county public defender, county legal defender or county contract indigent defense counsel and includes an assistant or deputy federal public defender, county public defender or county legal defender. 15. "Public official" means a person who is duly elected or appointed to Congress, the legislature, a statewide office or a county, city or town office. END_STATUTE